Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1031
Garnishee; final judgment; when rendered; effect; discharge by delivery of property; costs.

Final judgment shall not be rendered against the garnishee until the action against the defendant in the original action has been determined. If in such action judgment be rendered for the defendant, the garnishee shall be discharged and recover costs. If the plaintiff shall recover against the defendant in the original action, and the garnishee shall deliver up all the property, money, and credits of the defendant in his possession and pay all the money from him due as the court may order, the garnishee shall be discharged, and the costs of the proceedings against him shall be paid out of the property and money so surrendered, or as the court may think right and proper.

R.S.1867, Code § 226, p. 431;

R.S.1913, § 7760;

C.S.1922, § 8704;

C.S.1929, § 20-1031;

R.S.1943, § 25-1031;

Laws 1951, c. 67, § 11, p. 206.

Action under this section is a special proceeding. Western Smelting & Refining Co. v. First Nat. Bank of Omaha, 150 Neb. 477, 35 N.W.2d 116 (1948).

Order upon garnishee as to disposition of property awaits final judgment against defendant. Reed v. Fletcher, 24 Neb. 435, 39 N.W. 437 (1888).

Order of court is not conclusive on garnishee, and he may contest his liability. Hollingsworth v. Fitzgerald, 16 Neb. 492, 20 N.W. 836 (1884).

Order discharging garnishee is final order and reviewable. Turpin v. Coates, 12 Neb. 321, 11 N.W. 300 (1882).